sources-apertium-nor-eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"          c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np"         c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"         c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="part"       c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="adj"        c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv"        c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"     c="Preadverb"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"       c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"     c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"     c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"     c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="det"        c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="num"        c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"      c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"       c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"      c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"    c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"      c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="pp"         c="Participle"/>
    <sdef n="prn"        c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="ij"         c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="al"         c="Altres"/>
    <sdef n="top"        c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"        c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"        c="Cognomen"/>

    <sdef n="sint"       c="Synthetic"/>

    <sdef n="ord"        c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="ref"        c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="res"        c="Reciprocal"/>
    <sdef n="dem"        c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"        c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="rel"        c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"        c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"        c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="emph"       c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="pos"        c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="def"        c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="comp"       c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"        c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="sg"         c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="sp"         c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="pl"         c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="m"          c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"          c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"         c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"         c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="p1"         c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"         c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"         c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="subj"         c="Subject case"/>
    <sdef n="obj"         c="Object case"/>
    <sdef n="nom"         c="Subject case (Norwegian)"/>
    <sdef n="acc"         c="Object case (Norwegian)"/>

    <sdef n="pret"       c="Preterite"/>
    <sdef n="pri"        c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="prs"        c="Present subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="pres"       c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past"       c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="pstv"       c="Lexicalised passive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"        c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="inf"        c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"       c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="ger"        c="Gerund"/>

    <sdef n="GD"         c="Gender to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="ND"         c="Number to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="PD"         c="Person to be determined"/>

    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence boundary"/>
    <sdef n="clb"        c="Clause boundary"/>
    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"       c="Apostrophe"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="skulle_shall">
      <e> <p><l><s n="pres"/></l>	<r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vblex_vblex" c="specifies pos on nb side">
      <e> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></l>	<r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></l>	<r><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></l>	<r><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></l>	<r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l><s n="vblex"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/></l>	<r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></l>	<r><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pstv_vblex" c="specifies pos on nb side">
      <e> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="pret"/></l>	<r><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="imp"/></l>	<r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/><s n="inf"/></l>	<r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e> <p><l><s n="vblex"/><s n="pstv"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f|m_LR_f" c="TODO: use for nouns that are m_LR_f in nb, but only f in nn">
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL" vl="nob"><p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL" vl="nno"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m_LR_f">
      <e> <p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sgpl_pl">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sgpl_sg">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m_LR_f_sgpl_pl">
      <e> <p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r></r></p><par n="sgpl_pl"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r></r></p><par n="sgpl_pl"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="sp_sg">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="sp"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="sp"/></l>	<r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="qnt_num">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="sg"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="ND"/></l>	<r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="all_all">
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></l>	<r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prnpers_dem">
      <e r="LR"> <p><l><s n="m"/></l>	<r><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="nt"/></l>	<r><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="f"/></l>	<r><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="GD"/></l>	<r><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><s n="pl"/></l>	<r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e><p><l>denne<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/></l><r>this<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="prnpers_dem"/></e>
    <e><p><l>all<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>all<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="all_all"/></e>
    <e vl="nob"><p><l>noe<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>some<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="all_all"/></e>
    <e vl="nno"><p><l>noko<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r>some<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p><par n="all_all"/></e>
<e><p><l>avskyelighet<s n="n"/></l>  <r>abomination<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>bok<s n="n"/></l>           <r>book<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>flis<s n="n"/></l>           <r>tile<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>flis<s n="n"/></l>           <r>splinter<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>bølle<s n="n"/></l>         <r>ruffian<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>felle<s n="n"/></l>         <r>trap<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>fengsling<s n="n"/></l>     <r>imprisonment<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>ferje<s n="n"/></l>         <r>ferry<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>frihet<s n="n"/></l>        <r>freedom<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>hank<s n="n"/></l>          <r>handle<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>jakt<s n="n"/></l>          <r>hunt<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>løsning<s n="n"/></l>       <r>solution<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>urnordisk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Proto-Norse<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>penge<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>money<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_sg"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>politi<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/></l><r>police<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_pl"/></e>
<e><p><l>politi<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>police<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sgpl_pl"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>pusling<s n="n"/></l>       <r>sop<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>stilling<s n="n"/></l>      <r>state<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>trille<s n="n"/></l>       <r>stroller<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e>        <p><l>verd<s n="n"/></l><r>world<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>verd<s n="n"/></l><r>earth<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>virksomhet<s n="n"/></l>    <r>activity<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>å<s n="n"/></l><r>river<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></r></p><par n="f|m_LR_f"/></e>
<e><p><l>menneskerettighet<s n="n"/></l><r>human<b/>right<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="m_LR_f_sgpl_pl"/></e>
    <e><p><l>nordnorsk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>north<b/>Norwegian<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>finsk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Finnish<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>dansk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Danish<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>småfisk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>small<b/>fish<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>gresk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Greek<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>ungarsk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Hungarian<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>gotisk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Gothic<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>germansk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>German<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>norsk-dansk<s n="n"/><s n="m"/></l><r>Norwegian<b/>Danish<s n="n"/></r></p><par n="sp_sg"/></e>
    <e><p><l>skulle<s n="vblex"/></l><r>shall<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="skulle_shall"/></e>
    <e><p><l>skulle<s n="vblex"/></l><r>would<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="skulle_shall"/></e>
<e><p><l>moralisere</l><r>*moralise<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
<e><p><l>dufte</l><r>smell<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
<e><p><l>lytte</l><r>listen<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>rette</l><r>correct<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>balsamere</l><r>embalm<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>revne</l><r>rift<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>arkivere</l><r>archive<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>rydde</l><r>clean<g><b/>up</g><s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>mimre</l><r>reminisce<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>tampe</l><r>end<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>synes</l><r>think<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pstv_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>synes</l><r>seem<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pstv_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>finnes</l><r>be<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="pstv_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>finnes</l><r>exist<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pstv_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>trenges</l><r>be<g><b/>needed</g><s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pstv_vblex"/></e>
    <e><p><l>frabe</l><r>opt-out<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="vblex_vblex"/></e>
    <e><re>[¼½]</re><p><l><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p><par n="qnt_num"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p><par n="qnt_num"/></e>
